en: Horse rib steak
fr: Entrecôte de cheval
hr: Odrezak od konjskih rebara
lt: Arklienos šonkauliukų kepsnys

en: Frozen horse meat
fr: Viande de cheval surgelée

en: Ground horse meat
fr: Viande de cheval hachée

en: Frozen ground horse meat
fr: Viande de cheval hachée surgelée

en: Goat meat
bg: Козе месо
fr: Viande de chèvre
hr: Kozje meso
ja: 山羊肉, ヤギ肉
lt: Ožkiena

en: Young goat
fr: Chevreau

en: Cooked young goat
fr: Chevreau cuit

en: Rabbit fresh meat
fr: Viandes fraîches de lapin
hr: Svježe meso kunića
lt: Šviežia triušiena
nl: Verse konijnenvlezen
zh: 鲜兔肉

en: Kangaroo fresh meat
fr: Viandes fraîches de kangourou
hr: Svježe meso klokana
lt: Šviežia kengūros mėsa
nl: Verse kangaroevlezen
zh: 鲜袋鼠肉

en: Dromedary fresh meat
fr: Viande fraîche de dromadaire, Viande de dromadaire fraîche
hr: Svježe meso dromedara
nl: Verse dromedarisvlezen

en: Llama or lama fresh meat
fr: Viande fraîche de lama, viande de lama fraîche
hr: Ljama ili lama svježe meso
lt: Šviežia lamos mėsa
nl: Verse lamavlezen

en: Deer fresh meat
fr: Viande fraîche de cerf, viande de cerf fraîche
hr: Jelenovo svježe meso
lt: Šviežia erniena
nl: Vere hertevlezen

en: Deer fallow fresh meat
nl: Verse damhertenvlezen

en: Deer red fresh meat
nl: Verse edelhertenvlezen

en: Wapiti elk meat
nl: Verse europese elkvlezen

en: European moose meat
hr: Meso europskog losa
lt: Europietiška briedžių mėsa
nl: Verse europese elandvlezen

en: Reindeer meat
fi: Poronliha
fr: Viande fraîche de renne, Viande de renne fraîche
hr: Meso sobova
nl: Verse rendiervlezen

en: Roe deer meat
fr: Viande de chevreuil
hr: Srneće meso
nl: Reevlezen

en: Wild boar fresh meat
fr: Viande fraîche de sanglier, viande de sanglier fraîche
hr: Svježe meso divlje svinje
lt: Šviežia šerniena
nl: Verse everzwijnvlezen

en: Moufflon fresh meat
fr: viande fraîche de mouflon
hr: Svježe meso muflona
nl: Vers moeflonvlezen